District of Columbia statutes.
29-608.05

Statement of dissolution.

(a)

After dissolution, a partner that has not wrongfully dissociated may file a statement of dissolution stating the name of the partnership and that the partnership has dissolved and is winding up its activities and affairs.

(b)

A statement of dissolution shall cancel a filed statement of partnership authority for the purposes of § 29-603.03(d) and shall be a limitation on authority for the purposes of § 29-603.03(e).

(c)

For the purposes of §§ 29-603.01 and 29-608.04, a person not a partner shall be deemed to have notice of the dissolution and the limitation on the partners’ authority as a result of the statement of dissolution 90 days after it is filed.

(d)

After filing and, if appropriate, recording a statement of dissolution, a dissolved partnership may file and, if appropriate, record a statement of partnership authority which will operate with respect to a person not a partner as provided in § 29-603.03(d) and (e) in any transaction, whether or not the transaction is appropriate for winding up the partnership activities and affairs.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(f)(8)(F), 59 DCR 13171
This section is referenced in § 29-601.03, § 29-603.03, and § 29-608.04.
1981 Ed., § 41-158.5.
2001 Ed., § 33-108.05.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “activities and affairs” for “business” in (a) and (d).

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 805 of the Uniform Partnership Act (1997 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.